District of Columbia statutes.
50-1541.04

Law governing vessel covered by certificate of title.

(a)

The local law of the jurisdiction under whose certificate of title a vessel is covered governs all issues relating to the certificate of title from the time the vessel becomes covered by the certificate of title until the vessel becomes covered by another certificate of title or becomes a documented vessel, even if no other relationship exists between the jurisdiction and the vessel or its owner.

(b)

A vessel becomes covered by a certificate of title when an application for the certificate of title and the applicable fee are delivered to the Harbor Master in accordance with this chapter or to the governmental agency that creates a certificate of title in another jurisdiction in accordance with the law of that jurisdiction.

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-215, § 5, 61 DCR 13083
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-215: Section 32 of D.C. Law 20-215 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2016.